src-fst-morphology-stems-pronouns.lexc.md
## Plains Cree pronouns

There are more pronoums to be added here.

LEXICON Pronoun 

LEXICON Personal  \\
niýa+Pron+Pers+1Sg:niýa # ; 
kiýa+Pron+Pers+2Sg:kiýa # ; 

LEXICON Interrogative   \\
awîna+Pron+Interr+A+Sg:awîna # "who,whose" ; 
awîniki+Pron+Interr+A+Pl:awîniki # "who" ; 
awînihi+Pron+Interr+A+Obv:awînihi # "who" ; 
awîniwâ+Pron+Interr+A+Obv:awîniwâ # "who" ; 

LEXICON Indefinite  \\
awiyak+Pron+Indef+A+Sg:awiyak # "someone" ; 
awiyak+Pron+Indef+A+Pl:awiyakak # "some people" ;

LEXICON Demonstrative    \\
ANIMATE \\
awa+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Sg:awa # "this" ; 
ôki+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Pl:ôki # "these" ; 
ôhi+Pron+Dem+Prox+A+Obv:ôhi # "this/these" ; 

INANIMATE \\

ôma+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Sg:ôma # "this" ; 
ôhi+Pron+Dem+Prox+I+Pl:ôhi # "these" ; 

ôma+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Sg:ôma # "this one" ; 
ôhi+Pron+Def+Prox+I+Pl:ôhi # "these ones" ; 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-crk/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc)</small>

---
